Massachusetts, session 194th, H24.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 1 of Chapter 32 of the general laws, as appearing in the 2022 official edition, is
hereby amended in line 602 by inserting after the word “employer”:
, including any accrued sick, personal or vacation leave except when paid as a
supplement to the receipt of weekly workers’ compensation benefits pursuant to section 69 of
chapter 152;
of 1